languages/apertium-tuk/apertium-tuk.tuk.twol
Alphabet

 A B Ç D E Ä F G H I J Ž K L M N Ň O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü W Y Ý Z
 a b ç d e ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş t u ü w y ý z

 %{A%}:e %{Y%}:y %{U%}:y %{Ä%}:a 
 %{n%}:0 %{y%}:0 %{l%}:l %{s%}:s %{u%}:0 %{d%}:d %{r%}:r %{ä%}:a
 %>:0 %{Ø%}:0
 % 
 ;


Sets

Vow = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y
      a e ä i o ö u ü y ;

BackVow = Y A U O
          y a u o ;

FrontVow = Ä E I Ü Ö
           ä e i ü ö ; 

FrontVowUnround = E I Ä
                  e i ä ;

FrontVowRound = Ü Ö
                ü ö ; 

BackVowUnround = Y A
                 y a ; 

BackVowRound = U O
               u o ; 

Cns = B Ç D F G H J Ž K L M N Ň P R S Ş T W Ý Z
      b ç d f g h j ž k l m n ň p r s ş t w ý z ; 


Rules

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Devoicing"
Cx:Cy  <=> _ .#. ;
                   _ %>: [ :Cns ]/[ :0 ] ;
                except
                   _ %>: [ :ý %{Ä%}: :r ]/[ :0 ] ;
                   _ %>: [ :ý %{Ä%}: :n ]/[ :0 ] ;
                   _ %{Ø%}: ;
               where Cx in ( d   g   b   j )
                     Cy in ( t   k   p   ç )
               matched;

"Unepenthesis in stems"
%{u%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"Harmony of epenthesised vowel"
%{u%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[:0] _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %>:] ;
  where  Vy  in  (  y  y  i  i  ü  ü  u  u  )
  LastVowel  in  (  y  a  i  e  ü  ö  u  o  )
           matched ;

"Deletion of {S} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Passive l / n alternation"
%{l%}:n <=> [ :Vow | :l ] %>: %{y%}: _ ; 


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Naughty 'n'"
%{n%}:n <=> :Vow %>: _ ; 

"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:a <=> [ :BackVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[[ :0 - FrontVow:0 ] | %>: ] _  ;
            BackVow:0 %>: _  ;
        except 
            %>: :m _ :g %>: %{A%}:e ;


"A lengthens to ä after front vowels and replaces them"
%{A%}:ä <=> FrontVow:0 %>: _  ;
            %>: :m _ :g %>: %{A%}:e ; 
 
"{A} replaces final vowels"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{A%}: .#. ;
        where Vx in ( a e ä i o ö u ü y A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y ) 
        matched ;

"ä Vowel Harmony"
%{ä%}:e <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"E Vowel Harmony"
%{Ä%}:ä <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"Y Vowel Harmony"
%{Y%}:i <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
             :Vow %>: %{d%}: _ %{r%}: ;

"U deletion "
%{U%}:0 <=>  %>: %{s%}: _ %>: %{A%}: m .#. ;

"U Vowel Harmony (i)"
%{U%}:i <=> [ :FrontVowUnround :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                %>: %{s%}: _ %>: %{A%}: m .#. ;

"U Vowel Harmony (y)"
%{U%}:y <=> [ :BackVowUnround  :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                %>: %{s%}: _ %>: %{A%}: m .#. ;

"U Vowel Harmony (u)"
%{U%}:y <=> [ :BackVowRound :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                %>: %{s%}: _ %>: %{A%}: m .#. ;

"U Vowel Harmony (ü)"
%{U%}:ü <=> [ :FrontVowRound :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                %>: %{s%}: _ %>: %{A%}: m .#. ;

"y Vowel Harmony (i)"
%{y%}:i <=> [ :FrontVowUnround :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                e: %>: _ p [ .#. | %>: ] ;

"y Vowel Harmony (y)"
%{y%}:y <=> [ :BackVowUnround :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                e: %>: _ p [ .#. | %>: ] ;

"y Vowel Harmony (u)"
%{y%}:u <=> [ :BackVowRound :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                e: %>: _ p [ .#. | %>: ] ;

"y Vowel Harmony (ü)"
%{y%}:ü <=> [ :FrontVowRound :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
         except 
                e: %>: _ p [ .#. | %>: ] ;

"U Vowel harmony in -{y}{U}p"
%{y%}:ä <=> e:0 %>: _ p [ .#. | %>: ] ; 

"Remove e in e>{y}{U}p"
e:0 <=> _ %>: %{y%}:ä :p [ .#. | %>: ] ; 

"d -> t in vowel stem causative"
%{d%}:t <=> :Vow %>: _ %{Y%}: %{r%}: ; 

"{r} deletion in vowel stem causative"
%{r%}:0 <=> :Vow %>: %{d%}: %{Y%}: _ ; 

"{Y} deletion in vowel stem causative"
%{Y%}:0 <=> :Vow %>: %{d%}: _ %{r%}: ;
